src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON l24 ! frískur
 +A: Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2  ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2  ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2  ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1  ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2  ;
 +A: Pos_Def  ;
 +A: Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l25 ! danskur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A: Pos_Def2 	  ;
 +A: Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l26 ! vakin
 +A:^EPH a_m_sg_n_null    ;
 +A:^EPH a_non_umlaut_obl ;
 +A:^EPH a_umlaut         ;
 +A:^EPH adj_def          ;
 +A:^EPH Comp_Ari 		  ;

LEXICON l27 ! heiðin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ðin   # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>dnan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dnum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðins  # ;
 +A:d Pl_Msc3 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ðin	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>dna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dnari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>dnar  # ;
 +A:d Pl_Fem3 ; 
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ðið	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ðið	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dnum   # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðins   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ðin	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ðin    # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dnum   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>dna	 # ;
 +A:dn Pos_Def  ;
 +A:dn Comp_Ari ;


LEXICON l28 ! mikil 
 +A: a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A: msgpl ;
 +A: a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A: fsgpl ;
 +A: nsgpl ;
 +A:^EPH Pos_Def 	;
 +A:^EPH Comp_Ari 	;
  
LEXICON l28_2 ! lítil
 +A: a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A: msgpl ;
 +A: a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A: fsgpl ;
 +A: nsgpl ;
 +A:^EPH Pos_Def 	;

LEXICON MINNI
 +A:minn CI 	 ;
 +A:min SRi 	 ;

LEXICON l29 ! vakur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 	# ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ran	 	# ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>rum # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>urs	 	# ;
 +A:r Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ra 	 	# ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>rari 		# ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar  		# ;
 +A:r Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>urt	 	# ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>urt	 	# ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>rum # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>urs	 	# ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur	# ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>ur 	# ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>rum # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 	# ;
 +A:r Pos_Def2 ;
 +A:r Comp_Ari ; 
 
LEXICON l30 ! tepur
 +A: a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A: msgpl ;
 +A: a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A: fsgpl ;
 +A: nsgpl ;
 +A:^EPH Pos_Def ;
 +A:^EPH Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l31 ! trupul
 +A: a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A: msgpl ;
 +A: a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A: fsgpl ;
 +A: nsgpl ;
 +A:^EPH Pos_Def ;
 +A:^EPH Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l31_2 ! simpil
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>lan # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ils # ;
 +A:l Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>la  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>lar # ;
 +A:l Pl_Fem1 ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ilt # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ilt # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ils # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>lum # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>la  # ;
 +A:l Pos_Def ;
 +A:l Comp_Ari ;
 
LEXICON l32 ! búgvin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gvin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>nan   # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num   # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>gvins # ;
 +A: Pl_Msc3 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gvin	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>na    # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>nari  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>nar   # ;
 +A: Pl_Fem3 ; 
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gvið	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>gvið	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num   # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>gvins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>gvin	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>gvin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na	 # ;
 +A:n Pos_Def  ;
 +A:n Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l33
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:amal	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:amlan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:amals	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:amlir   # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:amlar   # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:amla 	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:omul    # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:amla 	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:amlari  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:amlar 	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:amlar   # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:amlar   # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:omlum	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:amla	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:amalt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:amalt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:amals	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:omul	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:omul 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:amla	 # ;
 +A:aml Pos_Def2 ;
 
LEXICON ELDRI
 +A:d CRi ;
 +A:  SRi ;

LEXICON l34 ! dottin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:tin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:tins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:tin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:tið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:tið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:tins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:tin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:tin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_2 ! dossin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:sins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:sið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:sið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:sins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_3 ! errin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:rins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:rið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:rið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:rins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_4 ! hyggin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:gins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:gið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:gið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:gins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;
