src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
danskur:dansk l25 ;
lítil: MINNI ;
tepur:tepur l30 ;
trupul:trupul l31 ;
sprottin:sprot l34 ;
transendentalskur:transendentalsk l24 ;
argentinskur:argentinsk l24 ;
bonskur:bonsk l24 ;
estlendskur:estlendsk l24 ;
fornføroyskur:fornføroysk l24 ;
grótføroyskur:grótføroysk l24 ;
ilskur:ilsk l24 ;
jødiskur:jødisk l24 ;
lapplendskur:lapplendsk l24 ;
malaisiskur:malaisisk l24 ;
óhøviskur:óhøvisk l24 ;
seismiskur:seismisk l24 ;
suðurlendskur:suðurlendsk l24 ;
agnvandur:agnvand l25 ;
aldanskur:aldansk l25 ;
amerikanskur:amerikansk l25 ;
meksikanskur:meksikansk l25 ;
afrikanskur:afrikansk l25 ;
franskur:fransk l25 ;
hálvdanskur:hálvdansk l25 ;
japanskur:japansk l25 ;
kubanskur:kubansk l25 ;
ramdanskur:ramdansk l25 ;
spanskur:spansk l25 ;
vandur:vand l25 ;
stórdanskur:stórdansk l25 ;
balin:balin l26 ;
deyðabangin:deyðabangin l26 ;
eyðtøkin:eyðtøkin l26 ;
fullvaksin:fullvaksin l26 ;
haftbundin:haftbundin l26 ;
herðasligin:herðasligin l26 ;
illnatin:illnatin l26 ;
kenslunomin:kenslunomin l26 ;
køstaskitin:køstaskitin l26 ;
megin:megin l26 ;
ótolin:ótolin l26 ;
skjótlisin:skjótlisin l26 ;
tagnarbundin:tagnarbundin l26 ;
viðbrekin:viðbrekin l26 ;
áliðin:á#li l27 ;
ballsnoðin:ball#sno l27 ;
brogðin:brog l27 ;
eyðbiðin:eyð#bi l27 ;
framleiðin:fram#lei l27 ;
góðlíðin:góð#lí l27 ;
hálvoyðin:hálv#oy l27 ;
kjafttroðin:kjaft#tro l27 ;
lýðin:lý l27 ;
ovstaðin:ov#sta l27 ;
óstaðin:ó#sta l27 ;
skógloðin:skóg#lo l27 ;
staðin:sta l27 ;
áhugamikil:á#huga#mikil l28 ;
blóðmikil:blóð#mikil l28 ;
búklítil:búk#lítil l28_2 ;
elapinkulítil:elapinku#lítil l28_2 ;
evurspinkulítil:evurspinku#lítil l28_2 ;
eydnismikil:eydnis#mikil l28 ;
framlítil:fram#lítil l28_2 ;
gávumikil:gávu#mikil l28 ;
gróðrarlítil:gróðrar#lítil l28_2 ;
haturmikil:hatur#mikil l28 ;
hendingalítil:hendinga#lítil l28_2 ;
kavalítil:kava#lítil l28_2 ;
kenslumikil:kenslu#mikil l28 ;
limalítil:lima#lítil l28_2 ;
lostamikil:losta#mikil l28 ;
maktarlítil:maktar#lítil l28_2 ;
møðumikil:møðu#mikil l28 ;
orðalítil:orða#lítil l28_2 ;
pinkulítil:pinku#lítil l28_2 ;
ráðamikil:ráða#mikil l28 ;
ræðslumikil:ræðslu#mikil l28 ;
skilalítil:skila#lítil l28_2 ;
sorgarmikil:sorgar#mikil l28 ;
tindamikil:tinda#mikil l28 ;
trúarlítil:trúar#lítil l28_2 ;
vandamikil:vanda#mikil l28 ;
viðlítil:við#lítil l28_2 ;
ærumikil:æru#mikil l28 ;
alfagur:alfag l29 ;
alvakur:alvak l29 ;
bráðvakur:bráðvak l29 ;
brúnfagur:brúnfag l29 ;
dapur:dap l29 ;
dýrdarfagur:dýrdarfag l29 ;
fagur:fag l29 ;
hárfagur:hárfag l29 ;
litfagur:litfag l29 ;
ljómfagur:ljómfag l29 ;
ovurvakur:ovurvak l29 ;
undurfagur:undurfag l29 ;
vakur:vak l29 ;
yndisfagur:yndisfag l29 ;
alvitur:alvitur l30 ;
bitur:bitur l30 ;
digur:digur l30 ;
gørvitur:gørvitur l30 ;
snævur:snævur l30 ;
trævetur:trævetur l30 ;
tvævetur:tvævetur l30 ;
vitur:vitur l30 ;
døpul:døpul l31 ;
átrúgvin:átrú l32 ;
brestbúgvin:brest#bú l32 ;
fátrúgvin:fátrú l32 ;
fullbúgvin:full#bú l32 ;
gróðrarbúgvin:gróðrar#bú l32 ;
havrógvin:havró l32 ;
kynbúgvin:kyn#bú l32 ;
nærrógvin:nærró l32 ;
rangtrúgvin:rangtrú l32 ;
snúgvin:snú l32 ;
uppsnúgvin:uppsnú l32 ;
áragamal:ára#g l33 ;
ársgamal:árs#g l33 ;
daggamal:dag#g l33 ;
deyðgamal:deyð#g l33 ;
eldgamal:eld#g l33 ;
elligamal:elli#g l33 ;
hálvgamal:hálv#g l33 ;
náttargamal:náttar#g l33 ;
træveturgamal:træ#vetur#g l33 ;
tvæveturgamal:tvæ#vetur#g l33 ;
veturgamal:vetur#g l33 ;
áhittin:áhit l34 ;
brettin:bret l34 ;
dittin:dit l34 ;
dossin:dos l34_2 ;
eftirskettin:eftirsket l34 ;
eiggin:eig l34_4 ;
errin:er l34_3 ;
fólkaskýggin:fólkaskýg l34_4 ;
framskyggin:framskyg l34_4 ;
frættin:fræt l34 ;
gessin:ges l34_2 ;
grannsíggin:grannsíg l34_4 ;
hittin:hit l34 ;
hyggin:hyg l34_4 ;
illvíggin:illvíg l34_4 ;
innsíggin:innsíg l34_4 ;
kássin:kás l34_2 ;
klársíggin:klársíg l34_4 ;
kvettin:kvet l34 ;
langríggin:langríg l34_4 ;
miðfirrin:miðfir l34_3 ;
óskettin:ósket l34 ;
óskyggin:óskyg l34_4 ;
prettin:pret l34 ;
skettin:sket l34 ;
skýggin:skýg l34_4 ;
sterrin:ster l34_3 ;
terrin:ter l34_3 ;
tilsíggin:tilsíg l34_4 ;
trýggin:trýg l34_4 ;
vatnfirrin:vatnfir l34_3 ;
innerrin:inner l34_3 ;
snerrin:sner l34_3 ;
biologiskur:biologisk l24 ;
akseptabul:akseptabul l31 ;
gøtudanskur:gøtudansk l25 ;
avgamal:av#g l33 ;
bi l27 ;
omandot l34 ;
lekkur:lekkur l30 ;
sikkur:sikkur l30 ;
simpil:simp l31_2 ;
proysiskur:proysisk l24 ;
atferðartrupul:at#ferðar#trupul l31 ;
grótgamal:grót#g l33 ;
aldargamal:alda#g l33 ;
umhildin:um#hildin l26 ;
eftirsíggin:eftir#síg l34_4 ;
burturdottin:burtur#dot l34 ;
avdottin:av#dot l34 ;
samangrógvin:saman#gró l32 ;
útboðin:út#bo l27 ;
halagrógvin:hala#gró l32 ;
tungrógvin:tung#ró l32 ;
